Missouri, session 2026, HB1668.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2020, to read as follows:
1.2020. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Foreign
Adversary Divestment Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Company", any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
liability company, or other entity or business association, including wholly owned
subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of those
entities or business associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit;
(2) "Divestment", the sale, forfeit, or otherwise contractual end of any current
or planned investments;
(3) "Domicile", either the country in which a company is registered, where the
company's affairs are primarily completed, or where the majority of ownership is held;
(4) "Foreign adversary", any person that is listed on the Specially Designated
Nationals and Blocked Persons List published by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of
the United States Department of the Treasury;
(5) "Official government capacity", any role, elected or appointed, in a
government or its subsidiaries;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1668 2
(6) "State-managed fund", any short- or long-term investment structure that is
state managed, state run, state controlled, or otherwise overseen by the state of
Missouri, a state agency, or any political subdivision of this state, including any agency
controlled by such political subdivision, over or in which the state or political
subdivision has primary discretion or vested interest. "State-managed fund" shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Public pension funds, public retirement funds, or other state-sponsored funds
that are sponsored, maintained, or contributed to or required to be contributed to by the
state of Missouri or any of its political subdivisions;
(b) City, county, or other local or municipal entity investment funds, reserve
funds, or other political subdivision-controlled investment structures; and
(c) University or college endowments, trusts, or other structure that constitutes,
wholly or in part, a public institution of higher education's investable assets;
(7) "State-owned enterprise", any company owned or controlled, in whole or in
part, by a government or by individuals acting in official governmental capacities in any
form.
3. (1) All state-managed funds shall be prohibited from holding investments in
any foreign adversary, state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, company
domiciled within a foreign adversary, or a company owned or controlled by a foreign
adversary, state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, company domiciled within a
foreign adversary, or other entity within a foreign adversary.
(2) All state-managed funds are prohibited from investing or depositing public
funds in any bank that is domiciled or has its principal place of business within a foreign
adversary.
4. (1) All state-managed funds are required to immediately, in good faith, begin
divestment of any holdings prohibited in subsection 3 of this section, with total
divestment achieved two years after the effective date of this section.
(2) For purposes of this section, "total divestment" shall mean reducing the
value of prohibited investments to no more than five-hundredths of a percent of the
market value of all assets under management by a state-managed fund.
5. No later than six months after the effective date of this section, the state
treasurer shall identify all companies that are state-owned enterprises of, are domiciled
within, whose primary affairs are conducted within, or whose majority ownership is
held within a foreign adversary and include those companies in a list of restricted
companies to be distributed to each state-managed fund. In compiling the list, the state
treasurer shall, at a minimum:

HB 1668 3
(1) Review and rely on publicly available information regarding companies that
are state-owned enterprises of, are domiciled within, whose primary affairs are
conducted within, or whose majority ownership share is held within a foreign adversary,
including information provided by nonprofit organizations, research firms, and
government entities;
(2) Contact asset managers and fund managers contracted by a state-managed
fund that invests in companies and in funds that are state-owned enterprises of, are
domiciled within, whose primary affairs are conducted within, or whose majority
ownership share is held within a foreign adversary;
(3) Contact other institutional investors that have divested from or engaged with
companies that are state-owned enterprises of, are domiciled within, whose primary
affairs are conducted within, or whose majority ownership share is held within a foreign
adversary; and
(4) Retain an independent research firm to identify companies that are directly
or indirectly investment holdings of a state or local fund that are state-owned
enterprises of, are domiciled within, whose primary affairs are conducted within, or
whose majority ownership share is held within a foreign adversary.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to inhibit, conflict, impede, or
otherwise interfere with any required financial safeguards, fiduciary requirements, or
other sound investment criteria to which any state-managed fund is subject.
✔